test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-jauns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - jauns: # Adjective 'eng green/fin vihreä' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/za%C4%BC%C5%A1/
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: jauns
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: jauna
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: jaunāka
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: jaunam
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: jaunākam
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: jaunu
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: jaunāku
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: jaunā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: jaunākā
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: jauni
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: jaunāki
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: jaunu
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: jaunāku
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: jauniem
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: jaunākiem
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: jaunus
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: jaunākus
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: jaunos
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: jaunākos
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: jaunais
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: jaunākais
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: visjaunākais
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: jaunā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: jaunākā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: visjaunākā
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: jaunajam
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: jaunākajam
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: visjaunākajam
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: jauno
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: jaunāko
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: visjaunāko
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: jaunajā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: jaunākajā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: visjaunākajā
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: jaunais
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: jaunākais
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: visjaunākais
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: jaunie
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: jaunākie
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: visjaunākie
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: jauno
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: jaunāko
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: visjaunāko
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: jaunajiem
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: jaunākajiem
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: visjaunākajiem
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: jaunos
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: jaunākos
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: visjaunākos
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: jaunajos
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: jaunākajos
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: visjaunākajos
     jauns+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: jaunie
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: jaunākie
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: visjaunākie
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: jauna
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: jaunāka
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: jaunas
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: jaunākas
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: jaunai
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: jaunākai
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: jaunu
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: jaunāku
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: jaunā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: jaunākā
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: jaunas
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: jaunākas
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: jaunu
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: jaunāku
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: jaunām
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: jaunākām
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: jaunas
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: jaunākas
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: jaunās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: jaunākās
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: jaunā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: jaunākā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: visjaunākā
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: jaunās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: jaunākās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: visjaunākās
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: jaunajai
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: jaunākajai
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: visjaunākajai
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: jauno
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: jaunāko
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: visjaunāko
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: jaunajā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: jaunākajā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: visjaunākajā
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: jaunā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: jaunākā
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: visjaunākā
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: jaunās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: jaunākās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: visjaunākās
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: jauno
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: jaunāko
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: visjaunāko
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: jaunajām
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: jaunākajām
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: visjaunākajām
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: jaunās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: jaunākās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: visjaunākās
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: jaunajās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: jaunākajās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: visjaunākajās
     jauns+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: jaunās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: jaunākās
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: visjaunākās
     jauns+A+Pos+Der/Adv+Adv: jauni
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: jaunāks
     jauns+A+Der/āk+Comp+Der/Adv+Adv: jaunāk
